Illinois, session 104th, HB37.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act is 5amended by adding Section 12.2 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3205/12.2 new)7    Sec. 12.2. Sale of property.8    (a) The Authority is authorized to sell any or all of the 9parcels of property described in Section 12. 10    (b) If the Authority sells the property described in 11Section 12, the Authority shall obtain 3 appraisals of that 12property, at least one of which shall be performed by an 13appraiser residing in Cook County. The highest appraised value 14from the 3 appraisals received plus the cost of obtaining the 15appraisals shall represent the fair market value of the real 16property only for the purposes of this subsection (b). No 17property may be conveyed under this Section for less than the 18fair market value. The Authority may sell the real property by 19public auction following notice of the sale by publication on 203 separate days not less than 15 nor more than 30 days prior to 21the sale in a daily newspaper having general circulation in 22the county in which the real property is located. 23    (c) All moneys received from the sale of real property   HB0037- 2 -LRB104 03034 HLH 13052 b1under this Section shall be applied as follows: first, to any 2cost incurred in connection with disposition or pursuant to 3this Section; second, for the repayment of any bonds or notes 4issued under Section 13 in connection with the sold property; 5and third, to the State Treasurer for deposit into the General 6Revenue Fund.7    (d) The Authority is authorized to enter into any 8agreements and execute any documents necessary to exercise the 9authority granted by this Section.